Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.670

Certificate of nomination—Checking signatures—Appeal of determination.

Upon the receipt of the certificate of nomination, the secretary of state shall check the certificate and canvass the signatures on the accompanying nominating petitions to determine if the requirements of RCW 29A.56.640 have been met. Once the determination has been made, the secretary of state shall notify the presiding officer of the convention and any other persons requesting the notification , of his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of the certificate or the nominating petitions. Any appeal regarding the secretary's determination must be filed with the superior court of Thurston county not later than five days from the date the determination is made, and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court within five days of the filing. Nominating petitions shall not be available for public inspection or copying.

[ 2013 c 11 s 29; 2004 c 271 s 157. Formerly RCW 29A.20.191.]